Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1913
Appealed causes; parties; how designated.

The cause shall be docketed in the Court of Appeals or Supreme Court under the same title it had in the district court. The party or parties asking for the reversal, vacation, or modification of such judgment, decree, or final order shall be designated as appellant or appellants, and the adverse party or parties shall be designated as appellee or appellees.

Laws 1907, c. 162, § 2, p. 496;

R.S.1913, § 8187;

C.S.1922, § 9139;

C.S.1929, § 20-1913;

R.S.1943, § 25-1913;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 53.

An intervener against whom a judgment has been rendered may cross-appeal. Kirchner v. Gast, 169 Neb. 404, 100 N.W.2d 65 (1959).

Party designated as appellee may take cross-appeal. Security Investment Co. v. Golz, 151 Neb. 172, 36 N.W.2d 862 (1949).